Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.117

Transportation efficiency reviews—Reports.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall encourage efficient use of state resources by providing a linear programming process that compares school district transportation operations. If a school district's operation is calculated to be less than ninety percent efficient, the regional transportation coordinators shall provide an individual review to determine what measures are available to the school district to improve efficiency. The evaluation shall include such measures as:

(a) Efficient routing of buses;

(b) Efficient use of vehicle capacity; and

(c) Reasonable controls on compensation costs.

(2) The superintendent shall submit to the fiscal and education committees of the legislature no later than December 1st of each year a report summarizing the efficiency reviews and the resulting changes implemented by school districts in response to the recommendations of the regional transportation coordinators.

[ 2009 c 548 s 310.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 304-311: See note following RCW 28A.160.150.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.